California, session 20252026, AB1791.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 39616.6 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:39616.6. Notwithstanding any other law, the state board shall not adopt any regulation or rule that would add more than two cents ($0.02) to the cost of a gallon of gasoline or add two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more to the cost to build any home. The state board shall submit data to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature that demonstrates how a proposed regulation is compliant with this section.SEC. 2. Section 40440.9 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:40440.9. Notwithstanding any other law, the south coast district shall not adopt any regulation or rule that would add more than two cents ($0.02) to the cost of a gallon of gasoline, add two thousand dollars ($2,000) or more to the cost to build any home, or add five thousand dollars ($5,000) or more to the cost to build a nonresidential building. The south coast district shall submit data to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature that demonstrates how a proposed regulation is compliant with this section.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.